Hawaii statutes.
[§321-532] Stroke system of care;
department duties. (a) The department shall participate in a systematic
process to evaluate, improve, and sustain stroke care throughout the State to
reduce death and disability from stroke. The stroke system of care shall
include:

(1) The requirement that hospitals meet specific
stroke patient treatment capabilities that will ensure that stroke patients
receive safe and effective care;

(2) The coordination with the State's emergency
medical services system to ensure that stroke patients are quickly identified,
transported to, and treated in facilities that have specialized programs for
providing timely and effective treatment for stroke patients to improve
outcomes; and

(3) The continuation of a statewide stroke coalition
to provide a mechanism to evaluate and improve stroke care in the State.

(b) The department shall participate in the
stroke coalition to:

(1) Provide agreed upon state level reports of
de-identified and aggregated data to the stroke coalition, government agencies,
hospitals, researchers, and other interested parties that have a role in
improving stroke care;

(2) Analyze data generated by the stroke database to
identify potential interventions to improve stroke response and treatment;

(3) Identify issues related to early identification,
triage, treatment, and transport of possible acute stroke patients;

(4) Encourage sharing of information and data among
health care providers on ways to improve the quality of care of stroke patients
in the State; and

(5) Develop and implement strategies to improve
stroke early identification and treatment, including identifying specific
hospital capabilities to receive, treat, and transfer stroke patients. [L 2015,
c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next